Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 16 DEALERS AND SALESMEN LICENSING
§ 49-1618. Denial or revocation of license requires hearing.

Before the department shall refuse to issue to any applicant a license provided for in this chapter, and before revoking or suspending any license, it shall give the applicant or licensee written notice of the action which the department contemplates taking with respect to the application or license, which shall provide that on or before a day certain, not less than twenty (20) days from the date on which written notice shall be served, the applicant or licensee shall show cause, if any, in writing duly verified and filed with the department, why the contemplated action should not be taken. Upon receipt of the written showing, the department shall fix a day certain, not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than thirty (30) days from the date on which it received the showing, when it will hear evidence and argument in support of it. Written notice of the date and place of hearing shall be given to the applicant or licensee, not less than ten (10) days prior to the date fixed for hearing. All hearings shall be held in Ada County, Idaho. A record or tape or other recording device of all proceedings had at the hearing shall be made and preserved, pending final disposition of the matter.

Notice to the applicant or licensee that the department contemplates refusing to issue the license applied for or contemplates revoking or suspending a license duly issued by it, shall have attached to it a complete statement of the facts upon which the department bases its contemplated action. In any proceeding under this section, the department shall have the burden of proving that the applicant is not qualified, or that the licensee has violated a provision of this chapter or a rule or regulation of the department.

The notices provided to be given to an applicant or a licensee shall be served by the department or its employees delivering the notice to the applicant or licensee personally, or by the department mailing the notice by certified mail to:

The applicant for a license at the residence address given in his application for license;

A licensed dealer or at the last known address of the principal place of business of the dealer; and

A licensed salesman at his last known residence address.

The date on which the notice shall be considered to have been served for purposes of computing time shall be the date on which the notice is delivered to the applicant or licensee personally, or the date on which the notice is mailed.

The director or his designee shall preside at all hearings and the department shall request the attendance of the advisory board at hearings. At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing officer shall make written findings of fact and recommendations to the director. The findings of fact shall be conclusive unless clearly erroneous and unsupported by the record. The director shall issue a written order which shall be the final administrative action of the department.
(6) If a dealer’s license is suspended as a result of an order of the director, the department shall conspicuously post two (2) notices of such suspension at each licensed location. The notices shall remain posted for the duration of the suspension and removal of the notice prior to that time shall be deemed a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 49-1619. Production of witnesses and documents.

In the preparation and conduct of hearings, the department has the power to require the attendance and testimony of any witness, the production of any papers or books, may sign and issue subpoenas, administer oaths and examine witnesses, and take any evidence it considers pertinent to the determination of the matter, and any witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees and mileage as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings in the district court of this state in civil action, but the payment of fees and mileage must be out of, and kept within the limits of, the funds created from license fees authorized in this chapter. The party against whom the matter may be pending shall have the right to obtain a subpoena from the department for any witnesses he may desire at the hearing, and depositions may be taken as in civil court cases in the district court. Any information obtained from the books and records of the person complained against may not be used against him as the basis for a criminal prosecution under the laws of this state.

§ 49-1620. Report of findings.

The director shall state in writing his decision after the hearing. If the director determines that an applicant is not qualified to receive a license, no license shall be granted, and if the director determines that a license holder has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or of a rule or regulation promulgated by the department, the director may suspend the license on terms and conditions and for a period of time as to the director appears fair, reasonable and just, or the director may revoke the license.

§ 49-1621. Judicial review.

Any party to a hearing before the department, or any party to a hearing has the right to judicial review in the district court. Appeals shall be as provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1622. Product liability responsibility.

A manufacturer must file with the department a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations required to be performed by a dealer prior to the delivery of a new vehicle to a buyer. These delivery and preparation obligations constitute the dealer’s only responsibility for product liability as between the dealer and the manufacturer. Any mechanical, body, or parts defects arising from an express or implied warranty of the manufacturer constitute the manufacturer’s product or warranty liability only, as between the manufacturer and the dealer. The provisions of this section shall not affect the obligation of dealers to perform warranty repair and maintenance as may be required by law or contract.

§ 49-1623. Product liability indemnification.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, it shall be unlawful for any manufacturer to fail to indemnify and hold harmless its franchised dealers against any judgment or settlement for damages, including court costs and reasonable attorney fees of the dealer, arising out of complaints, claims or lawsuits including strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, warranty (express or implied), or rescission of the sale, to the extent that the judgment or settlement relates to the alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly or design of new vehicles, parts or accessories or other functions by the manufacturer, beyond the control of the dealer.

§ 49-1624. Disclosure of damage required.

On any new vehicle, any uncorrected damage or any corrected damage exceeding six percent (6%) of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price, as measured by retail repair costs, must be disclosed in writing prior to delivery. Damage to glass, tire and bumpers is excluded from the six percent (6%) requirement when replaced by identical manufacturer’s original equipment.

§ 49-1625. Repaired damage not grounds for rejection.

Repaired damage to a customer-ordered new vehicle, not exceeding the six percent (6%) requirement, shall not constitute grounds for rejection of the customer order. The customer’s right of rejection ceases upon his acceptance of delivery of the vehicle, provided disclosure as required in section 49-1624, Idaho Code, is made prior to delivery.

§ 49-1626. Payment for delivery preparation and warranty service.

Each manufacturer or distributor shall specify in writing to each of its dealers licensed in this state, the dealer’s obligations for predelivery preparation and warranty service on its products, compensate the dealer for service required of the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor, provide the dealer a schedule of compensation to be paid the dealer for parts, work and service in connection with its products, and the time allowance for the performance of that work and service.

In no event shall a schedule of compensation fail to include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service and labor. Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed.

It is unlawful for a new vehicle manufacturer or distributor to fail to perform any warranty obligations or to fail to include in written notices of factory recalls to new vehicle owners and dealers, the expected date by which necessary parts and equipment will be available to dealers for the correction of those defects, or to fail to compensate any of the dealers in this state for repairs affected by recall.

A vehicle dealer may submit a warranty claim to a manufacturer or distributor if a warranty defect is identified and documented prior to the expiration of a manufacturer’s or distributor’s warranty:

While a franchise agreement is in effect; or

After the termination of a franchise agreement if the claim is for work performed while the franchise agreement was in effect.

All claims made by dealers pursuant to this section for labor and parts shall be paid within thirty (30) days following their approval. All claims shall be either approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days after their receipt, on forms and in the manner specified by the manufacturer or distributor, and any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days after receipt shall be construed to be approved and payment must follow within thirty (30) days.

A dealer whose claim has been denied due to failure to comply with a specific claim processing requirement, such as a clerical error or other administrative technicality that does not put into question the legitimacy of the claim, may resubmit the corrected claim as provided for in subsection (7) of this section.

A dealer shall have thirty (30) days from the date of notification by a manufacturer or distributor of a denial of a claim or a charge-back to the dealer to resubmit a claim for payment or compensation if the claim was denied for any of the reasons described in subsection (6) of this section, whether the charge-back was a direct or an indirect transaction, unless a longer period of time is provided for by the manufacturer or distributor.

Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement or other contract with a dealer and except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, after the expiration of one (1) year after the date of payment of the warranty claim, a manufacturer or distributor shall not audit the records of a motor vehicle dealer to determine compliance with the terms of a warranty claim. Provided however, that the manufacturer or distributor may audit the dealer for fraudulent claims during any period for which an action for fraud may be commenced.
(9) A manufacturer or distributor may make charge backs to a motor vehicle dealer if, after completion of an audit of the dealer’s records, the manufacturer or distributor can show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that:

With respect to a warranty claim, the repair work was improperly performed in a substandard manner or was unnecessary; or

The claim is unsubstantiated in accordance with the manufacturer [manufacturer’s] or distributor’s requirements.

Menu-priced parts or services;

Repairs for manufacturer or distributor special events;

Repairs covered by any insurance or service contract;

Vehicle emission or safety inspections required by federal, state or local governments;

Parts sold at wholesale or repairs performed at wholesale, which shall include any sale or service to a fleet of vehicles;

Engine assemblies and transmission assemblies;

Routine maintenance not covered under any retail customer warranty including, but not necessarily limited to, maintenance involving fluids, filters and belts not provided in the course of repairs;

Nuts, bolts, fasteners and similar items that do not have an individual part number;

Tires; or

Vehicle reconditioning.

(10) Nothing in subsection (8) or (9) of this section shall prevent a manufacturer or distributor from instituting a legal action for fraud as provided for in section 5-218, Idaho Code.

(11) The schedule of compensation for warranty parts and labor shall not be less than the rates charged by the dealer for similar service to retail customers for nonwarranty parts and labor; provided that such dealer’s retail rate is not unreasonable when compared with other motor vehicle franchises from the same or competitive lines for similar merchandise or services in the geographic area in which the dealer is engaged in business.

(a) For purposes of determining the schedule of compensation paid to a dealer by the manufacturer or distributor, the following shall not be considered in determining amounts charged by the dealer to retail customers:

(b) The dealer shall establish their schedule of compensation under the provisions of this section by submitting to the manufacturer or distributor one hundred (100) sequential customer paid service repair orders or ninety (90) days of customer paid service repair orders, whichever is less, covering repairs made no more than one hundred eighty (180) days before the submission of such customer paid service repair orders and declaring the schedule of compensation. The new schedule of compensation shall take effect within ninety (90) days after the initial submission to the manufacturer or distributor and shall be presumed to be fair and reasonable. However, within thirty (30) days following receipt of the declared schedule of compensation from the dealer, the manufacturer or distributor may make reasonable requests for additional information supporting the declared schedule of compensation. The ninety (90) day time frame in which the manufacturer or distributor shall make the schedule of compensation effective shall commence following receipt from the dealer of any reasonably requested supporting information. No manufacturer or distributor shall require a motor vehicle dealer to establish a schedule of compensation by any other methodology or require supportive information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to provide including, but not limited to, part by part or transaction by transaction calculations. The dealer shall not request a change in the schedule of compensation more than once every twelve (12) months.
(12) It is unlawful for a manufacturer or distributor or subsidiary to own, operate or control, either directly or indirectly, a motor vehicle warranty or service facility located in this state except on an emergency or interim basis or if no qualified applicant has applied for appointment as a dealer in a market previously served by a motor vehicle dealer of that manufacturer or distributor’s line make except as provided for in section 49-1613(3)(g), Idaho Code.

(13) A manufacturer [or distributor] may not otherwise recover all or any portion of its costs for compensating its dealers licensed in this state for warranty parts and labor either by reduction in the amount due to the dealer or by separate charge, surcharge or other imposition; provided however, a manufacturer or distributor shall not be prohibited from increasing prices for vehicles or parts in the normal course of business.

(14) All procedures and protections afforded to a motor vehicle dealer under the provisions of this section shall be available to a recreational vehicle dealer. However, the schedule of compensation afforded under subsection (11) of this section shall not apply to compensation for parts, systems, fixtures, appliances, furnishings, accessories and features of a recreational vehicle that are designed, used and maintained primarily for nonvehicular residential purposes.

§ 49-1627. Use of dealer and manufacturer license plate.

Any dealer or manufacturer license plate issued may, during the calendar year for which issued, be transferred from one (1) vehicle to another owned or operated by such manufacturer or dealer, in pursuance of his business as a manufacturer or dealer.

Dealer plates shall not be used on vehicles under the following circumstances:

On work or service vehicles not held in stock for sale;

On leased or rented vehicles owned by the licensed manufacturer or dealer;

On a laden vehicle designed for transportation of cargo, unless the manufacturer or dealer has complied with section 49-434, Idaho Code, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section;

On vehicles which have been sold;

On vehicles used by the licensee for furtherance of another business;

On vehicles owned by a licensed wholesaler used for personal use;

On vehicles owned by a licensed wholesaler, operated by their licensed salesmen, used for personal use.

Dealer and manufacturer plates may be used on laden vehicles operated by the manufacturer, dealer or his licensed vehicle salesman, in connection with the manufacturer’s or dealer’s business. A dealer plate may be used on a laden trailer in connection with a manufacturer’s or dealer’s business to move vehicles or trailers from a manufacturer to a dealer, from dealership to dealership or from a dealership to off-site locations in promotion of the dealer’s business as long as the power unit is properly licensed under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code. A dealer plate may be used on a vehicle assigned for personal use on a full-time basis to the dealer, or licensed full-time vehicle salesman. This personal use exception applies only to the manufacturer, dealer, or licensed full-time vehicle salesman personally, and any other persons, including members of their families, are excluded. A prospective purchaser of a vehicle may have possession of the vehicle with a dealer plate for not more than ninety-six (96) hours or may operate the vehicle when accompanied by the manufacturer, dealer or a licensed vehicle salesman.

Licensed part-time vehicle salesmen may use a dealer plate on a vehicle that is offered for sale only to demonstrate the vehicle to a purchaser, but not for personal use. Other employees or authorized persons, not licensed as a vehicle salesman, may use a dealer plate when testing the mechanical operation of a vehicle or for the necessary operation in pursuance of the dealer’s business, including the delivery and pickup of vehicles owned or purchased by that manufacturer or dealer.

Laden dealer and manufacturer plates may be displayed on any power unit in the dealer’s or manufacturer’s inventory to operate vehicles laden with vehicles that are in the dealer’s or manufacturer’s inventory in pursuance of the dealer’s or manufacturer’s business. Such use shall be limited to moving vehicles from a manufacturer to a dealer, from dealership to dealership, or from a dealership to off-site locations in furtherance of the dealer’s business. Such uses may include travel to licensed temporary supplemental lot locations, to and from auctions or to a new licensed location.
(a) Laden dealer and manufacturer plates shall not be used for personal use by the dealer or manufacturer or a licensed full-time or part-time salesman of the dealership.

Vehicle manufacturers and dealers shall keep a written record of the vehicles upon which dealer’s number plates are used for personal use on a full-time basis, and the time during which each plate is used. The record shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or any officer or employee of the department.

No manufacturer or dealer shall cause or permit any vehicle owned by them to be operated or moved upon a public highway without displaying upon the vehicle a license plate issued to that person, either under the provisions of this section or section 49-428, Idaho Code, except as otherwise authorized in section 49-431, Idaho Code.

(b) Laden dealer and manufacturer plates shall be valid up to a maximum of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds combined gross vehicle weight.

(c) Fees will be as provided in section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, for commercial vehicles at a weight limit of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds combined gross vehicle weight.

(d) The dealer or manufacturer may increase the weight limit through the purchase of a temporary weight increase permit, as provided for in section 49-432(2), Idaho Code.

§ 49-1628. Use of vehicle dealer loaner plate.

A dealer shall maintain a log showing the vehicle identification number, date, reason for use, and the name of the person authorized to use the plate.

The user of a loaner plate shall carry identification showing dealer name, number on plate, signature of dealer and year for which the plate is valid.

Loaner plates may be used on vehicles held in stock for sale which are loaned to a customer of a dealership while the customer vehicle is being repaired, and, on vehicles held in stock for sale and operated by the dealer or his family for personal use or for furtherance of dealership business.

Loaner plates may not be used on:

Work or service vehicles not held in stock for sale;

Leased or rented vehicles owned by the licensed dealer;

A laden vehicle designed for transportation of cargo, unless the dealer has complied with the provisions of section 49-434, Idaho Code;

Vehicles which have been sold;

Vehicles used by licensee for furtherance of another business;

Vehicles used for personal use by licensed salesman or other nonlicensed employees of the dealership;

Vehicles of which the dealer does not have legal ownership;

Vehicles being operated by an actual purchaser.

§ 49-1629. Odometers.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the service, repair or replacement of an odometer, provided the mileage as defined in section 49-114, Idaho Code, indicated remains the same as before the service, repair or replacement. Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before service, repair or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice shall be attached permanently to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or his agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced. Provided however, the notice shall not be required if the odometer reading is converted from registering in kilometers to miles, and the mileage on the vehicle after the conversion of the odometer is equivalent to its mileage before the conversion. No person shall:

Fail to adjust an odometer or affix a notice regarding adjustment, as required under this section.

With intent to defraud, remove or alter any notice affixed to a vehicle pursuant to the provisions of this section.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Disconnect, turn back, or reset the odometer of any vehicle with the intent to reduce the number of miles indicated on the odometer gauge.

Sell a vehicle in this state if that person has knowledge that the odometer on the vehicle has been turned back or replaced, and if the person fails to notify the buyer prior to the time of the sale, that the odometer has been turned back or replaced, or that he has reason to believe that the odometer has been turned back or replaced.

Advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install on any part of a vehicle or on an odometer in a vehicle, any device which causes the odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven.

§ 49-1630. Purchaser plaintiff to recover costs and attorney’s fees.

In any suit brought by the purchaser of a vehicle against the seller of that vehicle, the purchaser shall be entitled to recover his court costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee fixed by the court, if:

The suit or claim is based substantially upon the purchaser’s allegation that the odometer on the vehicle has been tampered with or replaced contrary to this chapter; and

It is found in the suit that the seller of the vehicle or any of his employees or agents knew or had reason to know that the odometer on the vehicle had been tampered with or replaced, and failed to disclose that knowledge to the purchaser prior to the time of sale.

§ 49-1631. Brokers. [Repealed.]

§ 49-1632. Applicability of chapter.

Any person who engages directly or indirectly in purposeful contacts within this state in connection with the offering or advertising for sale, or has business dealings with respect to a new vehicle sale within this state, shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state.

The applicability of this chapter shall not be affected by a choice of law clause in any franchise, agreement, waiver, novation, or any other written instrument.

Any provision of any agreement, franchise, waiver, novation or any other written instrument which is in violation of any section of this chapter shall be considered null and void and without force and effect.

It shall be unlawful for a manufacturer to use any subsidiary corporation, affiliated corporation, or any other controlled corporation, partnership, association or person to accomplish what would otherwise be unlawful conduct under this chapter on the part of the manufacturer.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair the obligations of a contract entered into prior to January 1, 1989, or to prevent a manufacturer, distributor, representative or any other person, whether or not licensed under this chapter, from requiring performance of a prior written contract entered into with any dealer, nor shall the requirement of performance constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. Any contract, or the terms of it, requiring performance, shall have been freely entered into and executed between the contracting parties. This chapter shall apply to any amendments, novations, records or modifications of prior contracts and to any contracts entered into subsequent to March 31, 1989.

§ 49-1633. Limitations.

Actions arising out of any provision of this chapter shall be commenced within a four (4) year period of the accrual of the cause of action. If a person liable under this chapter conceals the cause of action from the knowledge of the person entitled to bring it, the period prior to the discovery of his cause of action by the person entitled shall be excluded in determining the time limited for the commencement of the action.

If a cause of action accrues during the pendency of any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding against a person brought by the United States, or any of its agencies under the antitrust laws, the federal trade commission act, or any other federal act, or the laws or to franchising, such actions may be commenced within one (1) year after the final disposition of the civil, criminal or administrative proceeding.

§ 49-1634. Dealer sales — Minimum sales required for license renewal.

A vehicle dealer shall certify upon application for renewal of his dealer’s license that during the preceding licensing year he sold at least five (5) vehicles, either at retail or wholesale.

Failure to sell or to verify the sale of a minimum of five (5) vehicles shall be grounds for the department to deny renewal of the dealer’s license.

Any vehicle dealer who has had his license denied or has failed to meet the requirement to sell a minimum of five (5) vehicles during the preceding licensing year is entitled to a hearing as provided in section 49-1618, Idaho Code.

§ 49-1635. Salesman sales

Minimum sales required for license renewal. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 49-1636. Consignment sales.

An owner who consigns a vehicle to a vehicle dealer to be offered for sale or exchange on behalf of the owner to a third party purchaser, shall provide the dealer with either the certificate of title to the vehicle along with a power of attorney designating the dealer as an agent of the owner, or a duly executed consignment agreement between the dealer and the owner, along with a copy of the certificate of title of the vehicle being consigned.

A consignment agreement shall contain at the least, the following:

The name and current address of the owner of the vehicle as shown on the certificate of title;

The name and current address of any person holding a lien on the vehicle;

The name of the consignee;

A description of the vehicle including the vehicle’s make, model, vehicle identification number and odometer reading; and

A statement that the owner has appointed the vehicle dealer as his agent for the purpose of offering the vehicle for sale.

§ 49-1637. Education requirements for vehicle dealers.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the following continuing education requirements shall apply to a vehicle dealer for an initial dealer’s license and for the annual renewal, as provided in sections 49-1607(3) and 49-1634, Idaho Code, of a dealer’s license:

An applicant for an annual renewal of a dealer’s license must complete a four (4) hour education program as described in subsection (3) of this section prior to submitting a renewal application for a vehicle or vessel dealer license.

An applicant requesting an initial vehicle or vessel dealer’s license shall be required to provide certification that he has completed a department approved prelicensing class or program, including an examination on the materials that were presented prior to submitting a license application.

The education requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to an applicant for a full-time or part-time vehicle salesman’s license, manufacturer’s license or distributor’s license. The following applicants are also exempt from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section:

A vehicle dealer of nationally advertised and recognized new motor vehicles or vessels; and

A franchise dealer of new recreational vehicles, new motorcycles, new all-terrain vehicles, new snowmobiles or new vessels.

The continuing education programs and prelicensing class requirements required in subsection (1) of this section shall be developed with input from motor vehicle industry organizations including, but not limited to, the Idaho independent automobile dealers association, and shall be approved by the department:

Prelicensing classes shall consist of eight (8) hours of instruction or as otherwise approved by the department, which shall include the written examination.

Fees applicable to the prelicensing class shall not exceed three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

Fees applicable to the dealer education program shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

Any provider as approved by the department shall make the dealer education programs and prelicensing classes available on a monthly basis, at a minimum.

The continuing education programs and the prelicensing class/programs required in subsection (1) of this section may be provided by accredited educational institutions, private vocational schools, correspondence schools or trade associations, provided that the continuing education program and prelicensing class/programs have been approved by the department as required in subsection (3) of this section.

The department may promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

§ 49-1638. Manufacturer incentive programs for motor vehicle dealers.

A manufacturer or distributor shall pay a motor vehicle dealer’s claim for payment or other compensation due under a manufacturer incentive program within thirty (30) business days after receiving the claim, unless the claim is disapproved by written notice, with reasons stated, within thirty (30) business days of receipt of the dealer’s claim. A claim that is not disapproved or disallowed in writing within thirty (30) business days after the manufacturer or distributor receives the claim is deemed automatically approved.

A manufacturer shall not deny a claim based solely on a motor vehicle dealer’s incidental failure to comply with a specific claim processing requirement, such as a clerical error or other administrative technicality that does not put into question the legitimacy of the claim.

A dealer shall have sixty (60) days from the date of notification by a manufacturer or distributor of a denial or a charge-back to the dealer to resubmit a claim for payment or compensation if the claim was denied for a dealer’s incidental failure as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, whether the charge-back was a direct or an indirect transaction.

A motor vehicle dealer has ninety (90) days after the expiration of a manufacturer or distributor incentive program, or such longer time as provided by the franchise agreement, whichever is greater, to submit a claim for payment or compensation under the program.

Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement or other contract with a dealer and except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, after the expiration of one (1) year after the date of payment of the vehicle claim, a manufacturer or distributor shall not:

Charge back to a motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or indirectly, the amount of a claim that has been approved and paid by the manufacturer or distributor under an incentive program;

Charge back to a motor vehicle dealer, whether directly or indirectly, the cash value of a prize or other thing of value awarded to the dealer under an incentive program; or

Audit the records of a motor vehicle dealer to determine compliance with the terms of an incentive program.

A manufacturer or distributor may make charge-backs to a motor vehicle dealer if, after completion of an audit of the dealer’s records, the manufacturer or distributor can show, by a preponderance of the evidence, that:

With respect to a claim under a service incentive program, the repair work was improperly performed in a substandard manner or was unnecessary; or

The claim is unsubstantiated in accordance with the manufacturer’s or distributor’s reasonable requirements.

Notwithstanding subsections (5) and (6) of this section, a manufacturer or distributor may make charge-backs to a motor vehicle dealer for fraud at any time permitted by section 5-218, Idaho Code.